Maine, session 132, LD457.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
COMMUNITY COLLEGE SYSTEM, BOARD OF TRUSTEES OF THE MAINE
Maine Community College System - Board of Trustees 0556
Initiative: Provides one-time funds to encourage private and federal investments in order
to support climate resiliency projects related to the repair of certain historic structures on
the campus of Southern Maine Community College not related to the college's educational
mission, but used by members of the community for active transportation and outdoor
recreation, with an emphasis on areas vulnerable to sea level rise, increased flooding,
erosion and structural damage.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $1,000,000 $0
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $1,000,000 $0